src/esu.lexc.xfst
define AutomaticDevoicing v -> vv,
                          l -> ll,
                          s -> ss,
                          g -> gg,
                          g̲ -> g̲g̲,
                          r -> rr,
                          r̲ -> r̲r̲,
                          u͡g -> u͡gg,
                          u͡r -> u͡rr || [ Stop | VlessFric ] _  ,
                                       _ [ Stop ]                      .o.
                          m -> m̄,
                          n -> n̄,
                          ng -> n͞g || [ Stop | VlessFric ] _   ;

! Unnecessary devoicing                           
!                          r -> rr  || _ .#.                            .o.
!                          s -> ss  || .#. _                             ;

regex 
!     Lowercase          .o.
      arExpansion        .o.
      MultipleForms      .o.  
      AutomaticDevoicing  ;
